Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1520
Objective measures; required.

A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall demonstrate the benefit of a hearing instrument fitting by using objective measures.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 24.